Utah statutes.
53B-13a-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Cost of attendance" means the total of costs payable to the institution, plus other direct educational expenses and transportation and living expenses while attending the institution, set forth in institutional cost-of-attendance budgets which meet criteria established by board rules.

(2) (a)  "Eligible student" means a financially needy student who is:

(i)  unconditionally admitted to and enrolled at a Utah postsecondary institution on at least a half-time basis, as defined by the board, in an eligible postsecondary program leading to a defined education or training objective, as defined by the board; and

(ii) (A)  a resident student under Section 53B-8-102 and rules of the board; or

(B)  exempt from paying the nonresident portion of total tuition under Section 53B-8-106.

(b)  "Eligible student" does not include a graduate student.

(3)  "Federal poverty guideline" means the federal poverty measure issued each year by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services in the Federal Register.

(4)  "Financial aid" means grants or work-study stipends to financially needy students enrolled or accepted for enrollment at a Utah postsecondary institution.

(5)  "Financially needy student" means a student who demonstrates, on the basis of criteria established by the board, the financial inability, either through the student's parents or family, or personally, to meet all or a portion of the total cost of attendance at an institution for any period of attendance as defined by the board.

(6)  "Fiscal year" means the fiscal year of the state.

(7)  "Program" means the Utah Centennial Opportunity Program for Education.

(8)  "Utah postsecondary institution" or "institution" means:

(a)  an institution of higher education listed in Section 53B-1-102; or

(b)  a Utah private, nonprofit postsecondary institution that is accredited by a regional accrediting organization recognized by the board.

